Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 6 Sale Or Other Disposition Of State Lands
22-6-301. Sale by county court on application.

(a)

It shall be lawful for the county court of any county in which any permanent school lands and lots, as defined in §22-6-111, are situated to order the lands or lots sold at public auction by the sheriff, in legal subdivisions, upon the application of any person who may desire to purchase the lands or lots and who will deposit with the clerk of the court a sum sufficient to pay the costs of the appraisement, the estimate of the timber thereof, if any, and its commercial value, the survey thereof if one is necessary, and the advertisement and other costs of sale.

(b)

The applicant shall also file a written guaranty that he or she will bid at the sale at least two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per acre if the acreage is land and the full appraised value if the acreage is in lots.

(c)

The applicant shall not, by reason of his or her application and deposit, acquire any preference right to purchase the land or lots at the sale, but when the sale of the land or lots is approved, the deposit so made shall be repaid out of the purchase price whether the applicant is the purchaser or not, except that if the lands should not be sold because of the failure of the applicant to make and complete his or her guaranty bid, the deposit made by him or her for the cost of sale shall be forfeited and not repaid.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 344, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 9104; Pope's Dig., §§ 8760, 11740; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-701.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1919, No. 344, § 7, provided that nothing in that act would be construed to prevent the redemption of lands and town and city lots under §§26-37-310 and26-37-311 or subsequent laws.

Cross References.

Sale to federal government, §22-7-101 et seq.

22-6-302. Appraisers.

(a)

The county court shall appoint three (3) disinterested householders of the county who are familiar with real estate values to view and appraise the lands and lots and cause the timber, if any on the land, to be estimated.

(b)

Each appraiser shall take an oath, which shall be filed in the court, that he or she does not desire or intend to buy the land or lots or any part thereof and that he or she will not directly or indirectly be or become interested in the purchase thereof at the sale to be made by the sheriff.

(c)

Each appraiser shall receive for his or her services the sum of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for each day he or she is engaged in such service.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 344, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 9106; Pope's Dig., §§ 8762, 11742; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-703.

Publisher's Notes.

This section, insofar as it relates to the appointment of appraisers, may be superseded by §22-5-306.

As to redemption of certain land, see §22-6-301.

22-6-303. Notice of sale — Terms.

(a)

The sheriff shall give notice by publication in some newspaper published in the county where the land is situated, at least four (4) weeks before the day of sale, that he or she will sell the land or lots at the courthouse door.

(b)

Upon the day of the sale, the sheriff shall offer the lands or lots at public auction in separate legal subdivisions, if land, and by separate lots, if town lots.

(c)

The sale shall be between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 3:00 p.m. but may be continued from day to day, at the county courthouse door and between the same hours, until all has been sold or offered.

(d)

All sales shall be for cash.

(e)

If any bidder shall fail to perfect his or her bid by paying the cash, the sheriff shall resell the land, and the bidder shall be responsible for the difference between his or her bid and the price for which the land sold, which may be recovered from him or her in an action for the use and benefit of the permanent school fund.

(f)

If any tract of land or lot is not sold, it may be offered again as provided in this section until sold without a new application.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 344, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 9107; Pope's Dig., §§ 8763, 11743; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-704.

Publisher's Notes.

As to redemption of certain land, see §22-6-301.

22-6-304. Rejection or confirmation — Disposition of purchase money — Deed by Commissioner of State Lands.

(a)

The sheriff shall report without delay all sales to the county court, which may reject or confirm the sale.

(b)

If any sale is rejected, the county court may direct the sheriff to again advertise and offer the land or lots for sale.

(c)

If the sale is confirmed by the court, the sheriff shall execute and deliver to the purchaser a certificate showing that he or she has purchased the land and the price paid for the land.

(d)(1)

Out of the purchase price, the sheriff shall pay the cost of the sale, retaining for his or her services two percent (2%) of the gross amount received by him or her for the sale of the land, and immediately transmit the balance of the purchase price to the county treasurer of the county for and on account of the school districts located in the township in which the land is located and to be distributed to the districts in the proportion that the territory of each district within the township bears to the total territory of the township.

(2)

The school districts shall use the funds for any school purposes, including construction of buildings and retirement of bonds.

(e)(1)

Upon presentation of the certificate of purchase to the Commissioner of State Lands, the purchaser of the lands or lots, as the case may be, and his or her heirs or assigns, shall be entitled to a deed from the Commissioner of State Lands for the land or lots described in the certificate, and the Commissioner of State Lands is authorized to make conveyance of any land or lots sold under and by virtue of this subchapter.

(2)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall keep a full and complete record of all such sales and of the deeds so issued and shall keep as correct records of sales as the reports made to him or her may enable him or her to do.

History.

Acts 1885, No. 103, §§ 8, 18, p. 162; 1919, No. 344, § 5; C. & M. Dig., §§ 9108, 9110, 9113; Pope's Dig., §§ 8764, 8766, 11744, 11746, 11749; Acts 1955, No. 58, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-705, 10-706, 10-709.

Publisher's Notes.

As to redemption of certain land, see §22-6-301.

22-6-305. Certification of purchase money — Penalty.

(a)

Each county clerk shall, immediately after each sale of any part of school lands and lots under this subchapter, certify to the Auditor of State the amount of moneys received by the sheriff on account of the sale, and the Auditor of State shall charge this amount to the sheriff.

(b)

Any neglect, failure, or refusal by any county clerk to perform any and all duties enjoined upon him or her by the provisions of this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, the clerk shall be fined in any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense and may be removed from office.

History.

Acts 1885, No. 103, §§ 10, 11, p. 162; C. & M. Dig., §§ 9111, 9112; Pope's Dig., §§ 8767, 8768, 11747, 11748; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-707, 10-708.

22-6-306. Sale where no inhabitants in township.

(a)

Whenever there may be in the State of Arkansas any school lands or lots situated in any county in this state, and in a congressional township, or fraction thereof, where no inhabitants reside, any adult inhabitant of the county, by written petition properly verified by the affidavit of the petitioner together with the affidavits of three (3) other adult inhabitants of the county and setting forth that there are no inhabitants residing in the congressional township or fraction thereof situated in the county may require the collector of taxes or, if there is no collector, the sheriff of the county wherein the land is situated, to sell the land.

(b)

Sales of any lands under this section shall be made in the same manner as sales of other school lands or lots under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 330, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 9105; Pope's Dig., §§ 8761, 11741; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-702.

Publisher's Notes.

As to redemption of certain land, see §22-6-301.

Subchapter 4

— Swamp and Overflowed Lands

Cross References.

Transfer of records of swamp and overflowed lands to Commissioner of State Lands, §22-5-208.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1855, p. 202, § 6: effective on passage.

Acts 1937, No. 128, § 7: effective on passage.

22-6-401. Authority to sell.

The Commissioner of State Lands shall have full power and authority to sell lands granted by the United States Congress to this state under the designation, “swamp and overflowed lands”, and, in making the sales, he or she shall be governed by the provisions of this subchapter which may be in force at the time of sale.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 128, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8750; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-801.

Cross References.

Transfer of records of swamp and overflowed lands to Commissioner of State Lands, §22-5-208.

22-6-402. Application — Determination — Bond — Appraisers.

(a)

Upon the application made to the Commissioner of State Lands by any person, firm, or corporation seeking to purchase from the State of Arkansas any of the lands granted by the United States Congress to this state under the designation of “swamp and overflowed lands”, on which patents or entry certificates have not been issued by the state as shown by the records in the office of the Commissioner of State Lands, it shall be the duty of the Commissioner of State Lands to determine whether the lands described in the application are wild and unimproved, which fact shall be determined by the Commissioner of State Lands upon the filing with him or her of the affidavit of the county surveyor, the county judge, and one (1) other reliable and disinterested person residing in the county in which the lands are situated, which affidavit shall accompany the application to purchase.

(b)

Should it be determined by the Commissioner of State Lands that the land sought to be purchased is wild and unimproved, he or she shall, upon the applicant's filing a bond with the Commissioner of State Lands with a surety to be approved by the Commissioner of State Lands that he or she will pay all costs of the appraisal as provided in this section, immediately notify the sheriff and ex officio collector of the county in which the land is situated of his or her finding and direct the sheriff and ex officio collector of the county to immediately appoint three (3) reliable and disinterested householders residing in the county as appraisers who shall make an actual inspection of the land sought to be purchased. After they have done so, it shall be the duty of the appraisers to make a report in writing and file the report with the Commissioner of State Lands.

(c)(1)

The report of the appraisers shall set forth the estimated appraised value of the timber located on the lands, the estimated appraised value of any minerals or oil in the lands if any are known, and the appraised agricultural value of the lands.

(2)

The aggregate of the appraisals shall be treated by the Commissioner of State Lands as the value of the lands for the purpose of sale.

(d)

The report of the appraisers shall be accompanied by their oath, which shall state that they are householders and residents of the county in which the lands are located, that they have actually viewed the lands described in the report, that they have no interest in the sale thereof, that they are not related in any manner to the person who has made application to purchase the lands, and that the value fixed by them is, in their judgment, a fair and reasonable market value.

(e)

The appraisers shall be entitled to receive the sum of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) for each day necessary for making the inspection and appraisal, and they shall be paid by the applicant.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 128, §§ 2, 3; Pope's Dig., §§ 8751, 8752; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-802, 10-803.

Publisher's Notes.

This section, insofar as it relates to the appointment of appraisers, may be superseded by §22-5-306.

22-6-403. Conveyance.

(a)

When the report of the appraisers has been filed with the Commissioner of State Lands, he or she shall notify the applicant of the value of the land as fixed by the appraisers and, upon the applicant's paying into the State Treasury the value of the lands as determined by the report of the appraisers and presenting his or her receipt to the Commissioner of State Lands, the Commissioner of State Lands shall issue a patent conveying to the applicant all the right, title, interest, and claim which the State of Arkansas may have acquired in and to the lands by virtue of 9 Stat. 519, Ch. 84.

(b)

In no event shall any of the lands known as swamp and overflowed lands in this state be sold for less than two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per acre.

(c)

Should the applicant fail and neglect to pay into the State Treasury within a period of six (6) months from the date of the filing of the appraisers' report with the Commissioner of State Lands the amount necessary to purchase the lands, the Commissioner of State Lands may thereafter, for a period of three (3) years from the date of the filing of the appraisers' report, convey the land to any other person who may apply to purchase the land and pay into the State Treasury the price therefor as determined by the appraisers.

(d)

If the land is not sold within three (3) years after the date of the filing of the appraisers' report with the Commissioner of State Lands, it cannot thereafter be sold or conveyed to anyone by the Commissioner of State Lands until the land has been reappraised in like manner as provided by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 128, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 8753; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-804.

22-6-404. Preemption rights.

(a)

Any person who, either in person or by and through his or her tenants, resides on or cultivates any of the swamp and overflowed lands which may have been confirmed to the state shall have a preemption right to the lands to be proved as provided in this section.

(b)

Should the person, firm, or corporation making an application to purchase the lands show by affidavit of at least three (3) reliable and disinterested persons that he or she, either in person or by and through his or her tenants, is in actual possession of the lands under color of title and that he or she and those under whom he or she claims title have been in the actual possession thereof for more than fifteen (15) years prior to the passage of this subchapter together with the certificate of the clerk of the county court showing that the lands described in the petition of the applicant have been regularly assessed on the tax books of the county in which they are located for more than twenty (20) years prior to the passage of this subchapter, and that the taxes so assessed have been paid by the applicant or those under whom he or she claims title, then the Commissioner of State Lands shall execute a deed or patent conveying to the applicant all the right, title, claim, and interest which the State of Arkansas may have acquired in and to the lands upon the applicant's paying into the State Treasury the sum of one dollar ($1.00) per acre for the lands described in his or her application, together with a fee of one dollar ($1.00) to the Commissioner of State Lands for the execution of the deed.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 128, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 8754; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-805.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this subchapter,” Acts 1937, No. 128, was signed by the Governor and became effective on February 24, 1937.

22-6-405. Conflicting claims.

(a)

When there are conflicting claims to swamp and overflowed lands, the Commissioner of State Lands may administer oaths and shall decide, upon proper notice to the parties and upon hearing testimony and statements under oath, to whom the patent certificate shall be issued in accordance with the law on the subject and shall issue the patent certificate accordingly.

(b)

Should the other party whose claim is not allowed desire a certificate for the Auditor of State, upon which to have the amount paid by him or her for the land refunded, the Commissioner of State Lands shall issue the necessary certificate to enable him or her to do so, upon his or her surrendering his or her original certificate to the Commissioner of State Lands.

History.

Acts 1855, § 5, p. 202; C. & M. Dig., § 6765; Pope's Dig., § 8697; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-807.

22-6-406. Disposition of moneys.

All moneys paid into the State Treasury for the purchase of swamp and overflowed lands shall be appropriated by the General Assembly for purposes which shall not be inconsistent with the provisions of the terms of 9 Stat. 519, Ch. 84.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 128, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 8755; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-806.

Cross References.

Revenue stabilization and classification, §19-5-101 et seq.

Subchapter 5

— Tax-Forfeited Lands

Preambles.

Acts 1945, No. 266, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, under the provisions of Act 331 of the Acts of the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas, approved March 16, 1939, all coal, oil, gas and mineral rights were reserved to the State of Arkansas, in lands disposed of by the state between September 15, 1939, and February 24, 1943; and

“Whereas, Act 94 of the Acts of the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas, approved February 24, 1943, repealed said Act 331 of 1939, in so far as it affected coal, oil, gas and mineral rights, without making provision for the issuance of deeds by the Commissioner of State Lands to such coal, oil, gas and mineral rights so reserved, to the owners of such lands so conveyed with such reservations;

“Therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1939, No. 156, § 2: approved Feb. 28, 1939. Emergency clause provided: “Because of the urgent needs of certain institutions for such lands adjoining their properties, for building, recreational, and other purposes, an emergency is hereby declared and this act shall be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1943, No. 94, § 4: approved Feb. 24, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “Because of the confusion created by the reservation to the state of the oil, gas and mineral rights of tax-forfeited lands and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1945, No. 266, § 3: approved Mar. 20, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It is ascertained and determined that the titles of the owners of such lands so conveyed are clouded by reason of such reservations and that, therefore, an emergency exists, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1959, No. 221, § 3: July 1, 1959.

22-6-501. Transfer to state institutions.

(a)(1)

The Commissioner of State Lands is authorized upon application of the director of any state department or agency, the management or the board of trustees of any state institution, or the chief executive of any county, city, or school district of this state to issue to the applying governmental unit a deed for land listed on the Commissioner of State Lands' records as having been forfeited for the nonpayment of taxes.

(2)

The application shall include the following:

(A)

The proposed use of the land;

(B)

The proposed duration for the stated use; and

(C)

The division or department designated for the maintenance and operation of the property once deeded. Moreover, the Commissioner of State Lands is authorized to accept the application as submitted or recommend modifications to the application. The Commissioner of State Lands is further empowered to disallow any application determined by the Commissioner of State Lands to be contrary to the best interests of the health and general welfare of the state and its citizens.

(b)(1)

The deed issued by the Commissioner of State Lands to a state department or agency, state institution, city, county, or school district may contain restrictive covenants or reservations stating that should the governmental unit no longer desire to use the land for the proposed use stated in the application, said governmental unit shall submit a subsequent letter of application to the Commissioner of State Lands to request change in the use of the property, and the Commissioner of State Lands shall accept, modify, or disallow the request.

(2)

Moreover, should the governmental unit determine that the property can no longer be utilized, the property shall revert to the state, be held by the Commissioner of State Lands, and be treated as tax-forfeited land subject to the powers and authority of the Commissioner of State Lands.

(3)

Because this section applies to the disposition of tax-forfeited land, §22-6-601 shall not apply herewith.

(c)

No consideration shall be required for the transfer except the fee of one dollar ($1.00) as required by law.

(d)(1)

All deeds granted by the Commissioner of State Lands prior to the passage of this section are confirmed, and the title of all purchases under the deeds from the Commissioner of State Lands are quieted, established, and confirmed.

(2)

Collection of any outstanding ad valorem property tax indebtedness shall be stayed by the Commissioner of State Lands while title to the property remains with the governmental unit.

(3)

Should the property revert to the state pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the property may be sold as prescribed by the Commissioner of State Lands.

(e)(1)

Land donated by the Commissioner of State Lands under this section may be used for any lawful purpose or transferred pursuant to any lawful authority of the city or town.

(2)

Owners of property donated to a city or town under this section shall not have any right to retain any of the appraised value of the property.

(f)

Prior to conveyance of property, the Commissioner of State Lands may give consideration to the following issues:

(1)

Whether the prospective purchaser has a pattern or practice of not paying fines resulting from a citation for violation of state laws or rules or local codes and ordinances;

(2)

Whether the prospective purchaser has a pattern or practice of not timely paying property taxes; and

(3)

Whether the prospective purchaser was the prior owner of real property that was transferred to the Commissioner of State Lands as a result of tax delinquency during the preceding three (3) years.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 156, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-904; Acts 1991, No. 807, § 3; 2007, No. 1036, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2369.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this section”, Acts 1991, No. 807, was signed by the Governor on March 26, 1991, and became effective on July 15, 1991.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (f)(1).

22-6-502. Oil, gas, and mineral rights.

(a)

Where tax-forfeited lands are disposed of by the state by return to private ownership by sale or redemption, the oil, gas, and mineral rights shall be a part of the fee and shall be conveyed with it, and the deeds shall not contain any restrictive covenants or reservations relative to the oil, gas, and mineral rights.

(b)

Where tax-forfeited lands have previously been leased for oil and gas purposes and the lease is still in effect, a return of the lands to private ownership by sale or redemption shall not affect the validity of the existing lease, but at the expiration thereof, the oil, gas, and mineral rights of the lands shall attach and become a part of the fee and pass to the owner of the fee.

(c)

Oil, gas, and mineral rights in tax-forfeited lands which have been reserved in any deed from the state conveying the lands shall immediately pass to the present owners of the fee title to the lands. This provision shall not terminate any existing lease on such rights, but at the expiration of any existing lease, the rights shall pass to the owner of the fee.

(d)

When so requested by the owner of any lands conveyed under the provisions of §§22-5-206,22-5-301 —22-5-305 [repealed],22-5-307, and22-5-308 —22-5-311 [repealed], in which the coal, oil, gas, and mineral rights were reserved to the State of Arkansas, the Commissioner of State Lands shall, upon the filing of an affidavit of ownership of the surface rights so sold and the payment of a deed fee of five dollars ($5.00), issue to the owner of the lands a deed quitclaiming all interest of the State of Arkansas in and to all the coal, oil, gas, and mineral rights reserved in the deeds in the proportion that the surface rights in the lands owned bear to the whole tract sold.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 94, §§ 1, 2; 1945, No. 266, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-931 — 10-933.

Publisher's Notes.

Section 22-5-305, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 884, § 5, and Acts 2019, No. 972, § 2.

22-6-503. Recording in county — Fees.

(a)

All deeds issued by the Commissioner of State Lands for lands, including city and town lots which have been certified for the nonpayment of taxes, shall be forwarded or delivered to the recorder of the county in which the lands, including city and town lots, are located, and the recorder shall record the deeds prior to their delivery to the purchaser or redeemer.

(b)

Fees for recording the deeds shall be paid by the purchaser or redeemer at the time of making application to purchase or redeem the lands.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 221, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-942.

22-6-504. Refund when state's title fails.

(a)

The Arkansas State Claims Commission is authorized and empowered to make refunds of amounts received by the state for the purchase or redemption of tax-forfeited lands or of funds received by the state from the sale of islands when it has been determined by the commission that the State of Arkansas has no further right, title, interest, or claim in or to the land or islands.

(b)

No refund for more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) may be made under this section to any one (1) individual, firm, or corporation during any fiscal year.

(c)

One who claims a refund under this section shall furnish to the commission evidence which satisfies the commission that he or she is entitled to a refund and that the claimant has made diligent effort, where title failed by reason of a court proceeding, to require the plaintiff to pay all sums due the state at the time of sale by the state.

(d)

Any claimant for a refund of purchase money shall be chargeable with the value of any timber, stone, or mineral or other thing of value sold, destroyed, or removed from the lands or islands involved.

(e)

No refund shall be made under this section except the amount in excess of the sum legally due the state at the time of purchase or redemption.

(f)

Any taxes or sums in lieu thereof, paid by anyone since the sale to the state, shall not be included in the amount, if any, determined to be due the state.

(g)

The commission shall in each case determine the amount that should be refunded under the provisions of this section.

(h)

The Director of the Arkansas State Claims Commission is designated the disbursing officer for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 345, §§ 1-5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-934 — 10-938.

Subchapter 6

— Lands of State Institutions

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 325, § 1, provided:

“Notwithstanding the provisions of Arkansas Code §22-6-601, the Arkansas Soil and Water Conservation Commission is hereby authorized, if the Commission determines the property to be surplus, to convey to Betty Jean Hayes and Richard V. Powell as the heir of Richard Vernon Powell, for a price not less than six hundred and fifty dollars ($650.00) per acre plus interest at six percent (6%) compounded semi-annually from March 12, 1981, land formerly owned by Mr. Powell in White County, Arkansas more particularly described as:

“The SE¼ NW¼, the S¼ NE¼ NW¼, the W½ S¼ NW¼ NE¼, the SW¼ NE¼, the N½ NW½ SE¼, the E¾ S½ NW¼ SE¼, E¾ SE¼, and the N¼ NE¼ SE¼, all in Section 16, Township 6 North, Range 9 West, in White County, Arkansas, containing one hundred and seventy (170) acres, more or less, subject to reservations, easements and restrictions of record.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1931, No. 199, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1937, No. 317, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1987, No. 982, § 3: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared that the confusion that now exists on a large scale concerning the handling of the Sale of Land, to the detriment of the taxing agencies and the public; that the clarification made by this act is immediately needed to eliminate said confusion and any resulting harmful effects on the public peace, health, safety and welfare. By reason thereof, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 65, § 5: Aug. 26, 1994. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the procedures for the sale or other disposition of certain state-owned lands should not be applicable to the transfer of state lands to political subdivisions of the state; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to allow the state to transfer certain lands to political subdivisions as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.